Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-17] Maximum rate of interest.
No obligation or liability bearing interest at a rate in excess of six per cent
a year incurred by a person in military service before that person's entry into
that service, during any part of the period of military service, shall bear
interest at a rate in excess of six per cent a year unless, in the opinion of
the court, upon application thereto by the obligee, the ability of the person
in military service to pay interest upon the obligation or liability at a rate
in excess of six per cent per year is not materially affected by reason of that
service, in which case the court may make such order as it deems just.

As used in this section the term
"interest" includes service charges, renewal charges, fees, or other
charges, except bona fide insurance, as to the obligation or liability. [L
1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next